Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Chapter 26. Protection of Minors and Incapacitated Persons and Their Property; Powers of Attorney.

Editor's notes. —

Chapter 50, SLA 2016, made numerous changes to this chapter. Section 29, ch. 50, SLA 2016, provides in regard to the applicability of those changes as follows: “(a) This Act

“(1) applies to a power of attorney or substitute decision-making document created on or after January 1, 2017;

“(2) applies to a judicial proceeding commenced on or after the effective date of this Act concerning a power of attorney or substitute decision-making document created on or after January 1, 2017; and

“(3) does not apply to an act done before January 1, 2017.

“(b) In this section, ‘substitute decision-making document’ has the meaning given in AS

13.28.090

enacted by sec. 27 of this Act.”